Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.080

Election results.

If a majority of all votes cast upon the proposition favors the formation of the district, the county legislative authority shall, by resolution, declare the territory organized as a park and recreation district under the designated name.

[ 1994 c 223 s 44; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 29; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.080. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 8.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).